dictionaries/cs/index.dic
Augustýnek/PV
Bankov/PV
Baručák/PV
Bitnar/PV
Bokša/PV
Brzoň/UV
Bánom/PV
Chadt/PV
Civín/PV
Damec/UV
Drahoslav/PV
Dubčák/PV
Ečer/PV
Fallada/PV
Freitinger/PV
Frelich/PV
Gita/PVZQ
Golemba/PV
Hachler/PV
Hamža/PV
Heler/PV
Hladník/PV
Honza/PV
Huječek/PV
Héda/PV
Ironman/PI
Jarník/PV
Jenčík/PV
Kamaryt/PV
Kammel/PV
Klaub/PV
Kleslo/PV
Koncz/PV
Kosek/PV
Krakeš/UV
Kruchina/PV
Kuděj/UV
Kádek/PV
Lacina/PV
Lichna/PV
Livor/PV
Makyča/PV
Malicher/PV
Mencner/PV
Mezey/PV
Moses/UV
Mydloch/PV
Nevtípil/PV
Obrman/PV
Otypka/PV
Patrman/PV
Pellich/PV
Pizur/PV
Pléha/PV
Przybyla/PV
Pulcer/PV
Reisinger/PV
Rejf/PV
Rynda/PV
Růsek/PV
Seják/PV
Simeon/PV
Songcän/PI
Soták/PV
Stejkora/PV
Svojtka/PV
Taranza/PV
Tobiška/PV
Turinek/PV
Ulman/PV
Vele/PV
Viesner/PV
Vytin/PV
Vávrovec/UV
Zboran/PV
Zbožínek/PV
anarchokomunista/PDI
autentičtější/YRW
bacající/YN
bakteriožrout/PI
baňatější/YRE
bezděčnější/YRE
bezmyšlenkovitější/YRE
bezpočetnější/YRE
beztvářnější/YRE
bezúhonnější/YRE
bližší/YE
botanik/PIV
brněnštější/YRW
bytelnější/YRE
bědovat/AN
bělopásek/PI
cennější/YRE
cistovník/PI
cizejší/YRW
ctnostnější/YRE
defilovat/AN
devadesátero/F
devadesáterý/FY
devadesátikorunový/YRF
devadesátina/ZQF
devadesátitisícovka/ZQF
devadesátkrát/F
dikobraz/PI
distingvovanější/YRW
dobrodušnější/YRE
dobýt/IN
dokrmit/ATN
doléčenější/YRW
doprovokovávaný/YKRN
dotnout/IN
dotrhanější/YRW
dotřásl/ON
drobnější/YRE
drásající/YN
dvacatero/F
dvacatery/F
dvacet/FI
dvacetikorunový/YRF
dvacetina/ZQF
dvacetitisícovka/ZQF
dvacetkrát/F
dvacíti/F
dělnější/YRW
děsuplnější/YRE
důstojník/PI
elektromechanik/PIV
exot/PI
expresivnější/YRW
federační/YKRN
foxteriér/PI
generativnější/YRE
gordičtější/YRW
guvernér/PI
hmatný/YKRN
hnědší/YE
holoubek/PI
houbovitější/YRW
hrozivější/YRE
imitátor/PI
infantilnější/YRW
informativní/YKRN
internacionálnější/YRE
jeřáb/HPI
kanonista/PD
kantorštější/YRW
kariérista/PID
kataklyzmický/YKRN
kluzčí/YE
kolaborant/PI
konsolidovanější/YRW
korouhevník/PI
králík/PI
kumulativnější/YRW
kyselinovzdornější/YE
kyčelní/YRN
lasolet/PI
libovolnější/YRE
lokalizátor/PI
markytán/PI
metodičtější/YRW
milostnější/YRE
mládek/PIV
monumentálnější/YRE
muknutí/SN
mutant/PI
nadprůměrnější/YRE
nafintěnější/YRW
namíchnout/ATN
naškrábanější/YRW
nebožák/PI
nedotknutelnější/YRE
neochvějnější/YRE
neurasteničtější/YRE
normalizování/SN
nosatější/YRE
nájezdník/PI
objevnější/YRE
obřezanější/YRW
odestlal/ON
odevzdávanější/YE
odumřít/AN
odvedenější/YRW
ohnat/ITN
opozičnější/YRE
osidlovávání/SN
osmdesateronásobný/YKRF
osmdesátero/F
osmdesáterý/FY
osmdesátikorunový/YRF
osmdesátina/ZQF
osmdesátitisícovka/ZQF
osmdesátkrát/F
osmdesátý/YF
ostrouhávanější/YRW
ovčák/PI
ošemetník/PI
padesátery/F
padesátiletý/FYR
padesátka/ZQF
pašeráček/PI
plešší/YRW
plnomocník/PI
plošší/YE
pláme/N
polapitelnější/YRW
poleno/MQIR
političní/YKRN
povolnější/YRE
pozavíranější/YRW
poznávat/JTN
proděkan/PIV
proměňovanější/YRW
propalovávat/JTN
provázanější/YRE
pupkatější/YRW
přebrnkaný/YKRN
předehnat/ITN
přemístěnější/YRW
přenositelný/YKRN
přiklonit/ATN
připlácenější/YTW
přivázanější/YRE
regulovávání/SN
reverend/PI
rozbahněnější/YRW
rozmarný/YKRN
rozpouštěnější/YRW
rámcovější/YRE
sanmarinský/YRN
secvičenější/YRW
sedmdesateronásobný/YKRF
sedmdesáterý/FY
sedmdesátina/ZQF
sedmdesátkrát/F
sinolog/PIV
slýchaný/YKRN
smutnější/YRE
smířlivější/YRW
starožitník/PI
stékavější/YRW
střídat/JTN
sušší/YE
synátor/PIV
tercián/PI
truchlivější/YRE
tvrdohlavější/YRW
třicateronásobný/YKRF
třicetice/ZQF
třicetinásobný/YKRF
třicátý/YF
ubodávaný/YKRN
urážlivější/YRW
usypávání/SN
vegetarián/PI
velkolepější/YRE
vitálnější/YRW
vrkající/YN
vykrouženější/YRW
vykuřování/SN
vysídlení/SN
vyváženější/YRW
vyšší/YE
výreček/PI
vědecký/YKRN
zadefinovanější/YRW
zalhávaný/YKRN
zanášenější/YRE
zastiženější/YRW
zavinout/ATN
ziskovější/YRW
zjasnění/SN
zpřehledňovat/ATN
ztrhanější/YRW
údernější/YRE
Čech/PIV
čecháček/PIV
čtyrycetitisícovka/ZQF
čtyřicateronásobný/YKRF
čtyřicetice/ZQF
čtyřicetinásobný/YKRF
čtyřicátý/YF
říznutější/YRW
Šarnik/PV
Šlaichrt/PV
Šoffr/PV
Štíbr/PV
Šurányi/PV
šaškování/SN
šedesátero/F
šedesátikorunový/YRF
šedesátitisícovka/ZQF
šedesátý/YF
žebrák/PI
